Connecticut, session 2026, SB00351.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of section 10-151 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) The contract of employment of a teacher who has not attained
tenure may be terminated at any time for any of the reasons enumerated
in subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of subsection (d) of this section. [;
otherwise] The standard of review for all such reasons shall be the same
standard applied in other disciplinary actions under the terms of such
teacher's collective bargaining agreement. Otherwise the contract of
such teacher shall be continued into the next school year unless such
teacher receives written notice by May first in one school year that such
contract will not be renewed for the following year. Upon the teacher's
written request, not later than three calendar days after such teacher
receives such notice of nonrenewal or termination, a notice of
nonrenewal or termination shall be supplemented not later than four
calendar days after receipt of the request by a statement of the reason or
reasons for such nonrenewal or termination. Such teacher, upon written
request filed with the board of education not later than ten calendar
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 351
days after the receipt of notice of [termination, or] nonrenewal or
termination shall be entitled to a hearing, except as provided in this
subsection, (1) before the board, or (2) if indicated in such request and if
designated by the board, before an impartial hearing officer chosen by
the teacher and the superintendent in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (d) of this section. Such hearing shall commence not later
than fifteen calendar days after receipt of such request unless the parties
mutually agree to an extension not to exceed fifteen calendar days. The
impartial hearing officer or a subcommittee of the board of education, if
the board of education designates a subcommittee of three or more
board members to conduct hearings, shall submit written findings and
recommendations to the board for final disposition. The teacher shall
have the right to appear with counsel of the teacher's choice at the
hearing. A teacher who has not attained tenure shall not be entitled to a
hearing concerning nonrenewal if the reason for such nonrenewal is
either elimination of position or loss of position to another teacher. [The
board of education shall rescind a nonrenewal decision only if the board
finds such decision to be arbitrary and capricious.] Any such teacher
whose contract is terminated for the reasons enumerated in
subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (d) of this section shall have the
right to appeal in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this
section.
(d) The contract of employment of a teacher who has attained tenure
shall be continued from school year to school year, except that it may be
terminated at any time for one or more of the following reasons: (1)
Inefficiency, incompetence or ineffectiveness, provided [, if a teacher is
notified on or after July 1, 2014, that termination is under consideration
due to incompetence or ineffectiveness, the] any determination of
incompetence or ineffectiveness is based on evaluation of the teacher
using teacher evaluation guidelines established pursuant to section 10-
151b; (2) insubordination against reasonable rules of the board of
education; (3) moral misconduct; (4) disability, as shown by competent
medical evidence; (5) elimination of the position to which the teacher
was appointed or loss of a position to another teacher, if no other
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 351
position exists to which such teacher may be appointed if qualified,
provided such teacher, if qualified, shall be appointed to a position held
by a teacher who has not attained tenure, and provided further that
determination of the individual contract or contracts of employment to
be terminated shall be made in accordance with either (A) a provision
for a layoff procedure agreed upon by the board of education and the
exclusive employees' representative organization, or (B) in the absence
of such agreement, a written policy of the board of education; or (6)
other due and sufficient [cause] reasons. The standard of review for all
such reasons shall be the same standard applied in other disciplinary
actions under the terms of such teacher's collective bargaining
agreement. Nothing in this section or in any other section of the general
statutes or of any special act shall preclude a board of education from
making an agreement with an exclusive bargaining representative
which contains a recall provision. Prior to terminating a contract, the
superintendent shall give the teacher concerned a written notice that
termination of such teacher's contract is under consideration and give
such teacher a statement of the reasons for such consideration of
termination. Not later than ten calendar days after receipt of written
notice by the superintendent that contract termination is under
consideration, such teacher may file with the local or regional board of
education a written request for a hearing. [A board of education may
designate a subcommittee of three or more board members to conduct
hearings and submit written findings and recommendations to the
board for final disposition in the case of teachers whose contracts are
terminated.] Such hearing shall commence not later than fifteen
calendar days after receipt of such request, unless the parties mutually
agree to an extension [,] not to exceed fifteen calendar days, [(A) before
the board of education or a subcommittee of the board, or (B) if indicated
in such request or if designated by the board] before an impartial
hearing officer chosen by the teacher and the superintendent. If the
parties are unable to agree upon the choice of a hearing officer not later
than five calendar days after the decision to use a hearing officer, the
hearing officer shall be selected with the assistance of the American
Arbitration Association using its expedited selection process and in
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 351
accordance with its rules for selection of a neutral arbitrator in grievance
arbitration. [If the hearing officer is not selected with the assistance of
such association after five days, the hearing shall be held before the
board of education or a subcommittee of the board.] When the reason
for termination is incompetence or ineffectiveness, the hearing shall [(i)]
(A) address the question of whether the performance evaluation ratings
of the teacher were determined in good faith in accordance with the
program adopted by the local or regional board of education pursuant
to section 10-151b and were reasonable in light of the evidence
presented, and [(ii)] (B) be limited to twelve total hours of evidence and
testimony, with each side allowed not more than six hours to present
evidence and testimony except the [board, subcommittee of the board
100 or] impartial hearing officer may extend the time period for evidence
101 and testimony at the hearing when good cause is shown. Not later than
102 forty-five calendar days after receipt of the request for a hearing, the
103 [subcommittee of the board or] hearing officer, unless the parties
104 mutually agree to an extension not to exceed fifteen calendar days, shall
105 [submit written findings and a recommendation to the board of
106 education as to the disposition of the charges against the teacher and
107 shall send a copy of such findings and recommendation to the teacher.
108 The board of education shall give the teacher concerned its written
109 decision not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt of the written
110 recommendation of the subcommittee or hearing officer] render to the
111 board of education and the teacher a written disposition that shall be
112 binding on the parties. Each party shall share equally the fee of the
113 hearing officer and all other costs incidental to the hearing. [If the
114 hearing is before the board of education, the board shall render its
115 decision not later than fifteen calendar days after the close of such
116 hearing and shall send a copy of its decision to the teacher.] The hearing
117 shall be public if the teacher so requests. [or the board, subcommittee or
118 hearing officer so designates.] The teacher concerned shall have the right
119 to appear with counsel at the hearing, whether public or private. [A
120 copy of a transcript of the proceedings of the hearing shall be furnished
121 by the board of education, upon written request by the teacher within
122 fifteen days after the board's decision, provided the teacher shall assume
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 351
123 the cost of any such copy.] Either party shall have the right to request a
124 copy of the transcript and shall bear the cost of any such copy. Nothing
125 [herein] contained in this section shall deprive a board of education or
126 superintendent of the power to suspend a teacher from duty
127 immediately when serious misconduct is charged without prejudice to
128 the rights of the teacher as otherwise provided in this section.
129 (e) Any teacher or board of education aggrieved by the [decision of a
130 board of education] award of the hearing officer after a hearing as
131 provided in subsection (d) of this section may [appeal therefrom, not
132 later than thirty calendar days after such decision, to the Superior Court.
133 Such appeal shall be made returnable to said court in the same manner
134 as is prescribed for civil actions brought to said court] make an
135 application to the Superior Court to confirm, vacate or modify said
136 award pursuant to sections 52-417 to 52-419, inclusive. Any such
137 [appeal] application shall be a privileged case to be heard by the court
138 as soon after the return day as is practicable. The teacher or board of
139 education shall file with the court a copy of the complete transcript of
140 the proceedings of the hearing, [and the minutes of board of education
141 meetings relating to such termination, including the vote of the board
142 on the termination,] together with such other documents, or certified
143 copies thereof, as shall constitute the record of the case. [The court, upon
144 such appeal, shall review the proceedings of such hearing. The court,
145 upon such appeal and hearing thereon, may affirm or reverse the
146 decision appealed from in accordance with subsection (j) of section 4-
147 183. Costs shall not be allowed against the board of education unless it
148 appears to the court that it acted with gross negligence or in bad faith or
149 with malice in making the decision appealed from.]
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-151(c) to (e)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (d), "the terms of" was added before "such teacher's" for
consistency.
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 351
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6